Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.17 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Education, in consultation with
experts in political history, human rights, and the history of
communism, shall develop, and make available to public schools,
resources related to the atrocities of communism for grade-
appropriate instruction of students in grades six through twelve.
B. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the atrocities of
communism shall be taught to students in grades six through twelve
Req. No. 10430 Page 1

in p ublic schools in this state, as prescribed in the Oklahoma
Academic Standards. This instruction may be integrated into one or
more existing courses of study and shall be taught in a manner that:
1. Fosters an understanding of the causes, rise, and
consequences of communist regimes, including the historical context
of hostile takeovers and political revolutions;
2. Explores the human cost of communism, including the
systematic slaughter, imprisonment, and oppression of individuals,
as well as the loss of basic freedoms and human rights;
3. Examines the effects of communism on societies, economies,
and cultures, highlighting the destruction of social and economic
structures under such regimes;
4. Promotes dialogue on the advantages and protections afforded
to Americans through the principles of the United States’
constitutional republic political structure, including individual
liberties, property rights, and the rule of law; and
5. Develops critical thinking about political systems,
encouraging students to evaluate the values and outcomes of freedom,
constitutional republics, and human dignity.
C. The State Department of Education, in consultation with
experts in political history and education, shall develop and
implement high-quality professional learning opportunities for
educators tasked with teaching the atrocities of communism.

Req. No. 10430 Page 2

D. For the purposes of this section, "communism" refers to a
political and economic ideology advocating for a classless society
under state-controlled means of production, historically leading to
authoritarian governance, widespread oppression, and mass
atrocities, as seen in regimes such as the Soviet Union, the
People’s Republic of China, Cuba, Cambodia, and others.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

60-1-10430 SW 01/14/25















Req. No. 10430 Page 3